Washington statutes.
RCW 11.64.030

Surviving partner or partners may purchase deceased's interest—Valuation—Conditions of sale—Protection against partnership liabilities.

The surviving partner or the surviving partners jointly, shall have the right at any time to petition the court to purchase the interests of a deceased partner in the partnership. Upon a hearing pursuant to such petition the court shall, in such manner as it sees fit, determine and by order fix the value of the interest of the deceased partner over and above all partnership debts and obligations, the price, terms, and conditions of such sale and the period of time during which the surviving partner or partners shall have the prior right to purchase the interest of the deceased partner. If any such surviving partner be also the personal representative of the estate of the deceased partner, such fact shall not affect his or her right to purchase, or to join with the other surviving partners to purchase such interest in the manner hereinbefore provided.

The court shall make such orders in connection with such sale as it deems proper or necessary to protect the estate of the deceased against any liability for partnership debts or obligations.

[ 2010 c 8 s 2055; 1977 ex.s. c 234 s 17; 1965 c 145 s 11.64.030. Prior: 1951 c 197 s 5; prior: 1917 c 156 s 89; 1859 p 186 ss 120-130; 1854 p 274 ss 46-53; RRS s 1459.]

NOTES:

Application, effective date—Severability—1977 ex.s. c 234: See notes following RCW 11.20.020.